Utah statutes.
38-1-17.   Costs -- Apportionment -- Costs and attorneys' fee to subcontractor.

Except as provided in Section 38-11-107, as between the owner and the contractor the court shall apportion the costs according to the right of the case, but in all cases each subcontractor exhibiting a lien shall have his costs awarded to him, including the costs of preparing and recording the notice of claim of lien and such reasonable attorneys' fee as may be incurred in preparing and recording said notice of claim of lien.

